Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-3034
Controllable electronic record kiosk operator; license required; reporting requirements.

(1) A controllable electronic record kiosk operator shall not engage in controllable electronic record kiosk transactions or hold itself out as being able to engage in such transactions with or on behalf of another person unless the kiosk operator has a license issued under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to section 8-2725.

(2) A controllable electronic record kiosk operator shall report each controllable electronic record kiosk as an authorized delegate under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to section 8-2730.

(3) In addition to the required reporting of authorized delegates pursuant to section 8-2730, each controllable electronic record kiosk operator shall submit to the department within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter a list of all associated controllable electronic record addresses utilized by each controllable electronic record kiosk, on a form as prescribed by the department.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 3.

Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, see section 8-2701.